District of Columbia statutes.
22-3251

Extortion.

(a)

A person commits the offense of extortion if:

(1)

That person obtains or attempts to obtain the property of another with the other’s consent which was induced by wrongful use of actual or threatened force or violence or by wrongful threat of economic injury; or

(2)

That person obtains or attempts to obtain property of another with the other’s consent which was obtained under color or pretense of official right.

(b)

Any person convicted of extortion shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 151, 29 DCR 3976
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(t), 60 DCR 2064
Enhanced penalty for crimes committed against senior citizen victims, see § 22-3601.
This section is referenced in § 23-546.
1981 Ed., § 22-3851.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $10,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(t) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.